Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.085

Cap on medical benefits—Alternative programs.

The director of labor and industries shall institute a cap on medical benefits of one hundred fifty thousand dollars per injury or death.

For the purposes of this section, an individual will not be required to use his or her assets other than funds recovered as a result of a civil action or criminal restitution, for medical expenses or pain and suffering, in order to qualify for an alternative source of payment.

The director shall, in cooperation with the department of social and health services, establish by October 1, 1989, a process to aid crime victims in identifying and applying for appropriate alternative benefit programs, if any, administered by the department of social and health services.

[ 2011 c 346 s 502; (2010 c 122 s 2 expired July 1, 2015); 2009 c 479 s 9; 1990 c 3 s 504; 1989 1st ex.s. c 5 s 3.]

NOTES:

Intent—Retroactive application—Effective date—2011 c 346: See notes following RCW 7.68.020.

Effective date, application—Expiration date—2010 c 122 ss 1 and 2: See notes following RCW 7.68.070.

Effective date—2009 c 479: See note following RCW 2.56.030.

Application—Transition plans—1989 1st ex.s. c 5 s 3: "The cap on medical benefits established by section 3 of this act shall apply equally to current and future recipients of crime victims' compensation benefits. The director shall prepare individual transition plans for individuals who exceed the medical benefit cap on July 1, 1989. The transition plans must be completed within ninety days of July 1, 1989." [ 1989 1st ex.s. c 5 s 4.]

Severability—Application—Effective dates—1989 1st ex.s. c 5: See notes following RCW 7.68.015.